THE REGENERATION NICHE IN BOTTOMLAND HARDWOOD FORESTS: TREE AND HERBACEOUS COMMUNITIES ALONG INTERACTING GRADIENTS OF FLOOD AND LIGHT IN EAST TEXAS FLOODPLAINS

By 

CLIFTON F. ALBRECHT, M.S. Biology

Presented to the Faculty of the Graduate School of 
Stephen F. Austin State University
In Partial Fulfillment 
Of the Requirements

For the Degree of
PhD in Forestry

STEPHEN F. AUSTIN STATE UNIVERSITY
February 2023


TABLE OF CONTENTS
INTRODUCTION……………………………………………………………………….4
GOALS & OBJECTIVES………………………………………………………………...
LITERATURE REVIEW………………………………………………………………...
   FLOODPLAIN ECOLOGY………………………………………………..………….
      FLOODPLAINS IN A GLOBAL CONTEXT…….……….……………………………..
      BOTTOMLAND HARDWOOD FORESTS………………………………...…………...
      HERBACEOUS FLORA OF BOTTOMLANDHARDWOOD FORESTS……………….
   REGENERATION………………………………………………………………………
      THE REGENERATION NICHE………………………………………………………...
      FLOOD STRESS AND TOLERANCE…………………………………………………..
      FLOOD RESPONSES OF WETLAND HARDWOODS………………………………...
      SHADE STRESS AND TOLERANCE…………………………………………………..
      TRADEOFF BETWEEN SHADE AND FLOOD TOLERANCE………………………..
METHODS………………………………………………………………………………...
   OBJECTIVE 1…………………………………………………………………………..
      STUDY REGION………………………………………………………………………..
      SURVEY SITES…………………………………………………………………………
      QUADRAT DESIGN AND PLACEMENT……………………………………………...
      ENVIRONMENTAL DATA COLLECTION…………………………………………….
      SEEDLING AND SAPLING DATA COLLECTION……………………………………
      HERBACEOUS UNDERSTORY DATA COLLECTION………………………………..
      AUTONOMOUS FLOOD DATA RECORDING……………………………………….
      SEEDLINGS AND SAPLING SURVEYS ANALYSIS…………………………………...
      HERBACEOUS SURVEYS ANALYSIS…………………………………………………
   OBJECTIVE 2…………………………………………………………………………..
      STUDY DESIGN………………………………………………………………………..
      DATA COLLECTION…………………………………………………………………..
      DATA ANALYSIS……………………………………………………………………….
TABLE 1…………………………………………………………………………………...
FIGURE 1………………………………………………………………………………...
FIGURE 2………………………………………………………………………………...
FIGURE 3………………………………………………………………………………...
FIGURE 4………………………………………………………………………………...
REFERENCES……………………………………………………………………………

INTRODUCTION 
	Floodplains are dynamic, biodiverse ecosystems which serve to provision society with a wide variety of services (Lewin 1978). They represent an ecotone between riparian and adjacent upland areas, exhibiting characteristics of both, and are shaped ecologically and geomorphologically by a regime of semi-regular alternation between submersion under overbank flows and exposure of the land surface above water. Globally they support a wide variety of ecosystems, from the dense tropical forests of the Amazon River to the taiga of the Mackenzie River delta. On the southern Atlantic and northern Gulf coastal plains of the United States, the area here under consideration, they are naturally vegetated in a mixture of flood-tolerant hardwoods and associated undergrowth collectively referred to as “bottomland hardwood” (BLH) forest.
	BLH forests develop on river floodplains of the southeastern United States which are inundated in most years for significant periods of time (Hupp 2000, Kroeschel et al. 2016). They are distinct from nearby upland forests in that they are typically dominated by hardwoods which exhibit some degree of tolerance for the physical rigors of soil hypoxia and persistently high water tables. This tolerance exists as a gradient from, at one extreme, that of species of perpetually-inundated swamps such as water tupelo (Nyssa aquatica  L.) and baldcypress (Taxodium distichum (L.) Rich), to that of species more commonly found on unflooded uplands such as white oak (Quercus alba L.), loblolly pine (Pinus taeda L., a softwood), and southern red oak (Quercus falcata Michx.). Although topographically uniform in comparison with hilly or mountainous uplands, floodplains which support BLH forest are typically extremely heterogeneous with regards to microtopographic features such as swales, bowls, and flats (Hupp 2000). While these topographic features may span an elevational range of only 1-2 meters, these small differences are amplified into large differences in biologically meaningful conditions between points by the occurrence of regular flooding which may differ in duration by hours to weeks between points differing by centimeters to decameters in elevation.
	BLH forests are important for the maintenance of biodiversity across the southeastern United States. Tree species richness per unit area in these systems is very high by the standards of temperate North America, with approximately 50 species of commercial importance within the Lower Mississippi Alluvial Valley (Kellison and Young 1997). Richness of herbaceous and other understory species is similarly high, with a flora largely distinct from that of adjacent uplands (Quine 2000, Brown et al. 2006). BLH forests support large numbers and a high richness of invertebrates, avifauna, herpetofauna, and mammals (Kellison and Young 1997). Interestingly, they are rare among forested ecosystems in North America in that they also directly sustain fishes and associated aquatic animal species by providing food and other resources during periods of floodplain inundation (Adams et al. 2007, Alford and Walker 2011). BLH forests provide a wide array of regulatory and provisioning ecosystem services, including amelioration of flood peak intensity, improvement of river and reservoir water quality, maintenance of river base flows, and timber and game resources (Kellison and Young 1997).  
BLH forests have been impacted at a high rate by conversion to agricultural and urban uses because they are fertile, topographically uniform, and easily irrigated. Loss of these forests relative to the pre-colonial era vary considerably by region and river basin but, across the southeast, have been tallied in the tens of millions of hectares (Kellison and Young 1997, Kroeschel et al. 2016). Beyond simple loss of areal extent, even relatively intact BLH forests are facing invasion by non-native, invasive species such as the Chinese tallowtree (Triadica sebifera L.) and may be facing long-term challenges to natural regeneration of historically dominant tree species due to levee-, dam-, and drainage-mediated alterations to historic flood regimes (Kroeschel et al. 2016, Pile et al. 2017. King and Keim 2019). Widespread restoration and conservation of the forest type is and will continue to be necessary in order to maintain the many benefits that it provides. 
	Unfortunately, the environmental complexity and dynamism of BLH forests can confer challenges to sustainable management and restoration thereof. Sheer inter- and intra-annual variation in environmental conditions, particularly flooding stress, can complicate regeneration of tree species in ways not shared by adjacent upland forests. Understory advance regeneration or seedlings planted for the goal of reforestation can be killed by unexpected inundation of an area, and movement of seeds of Chinese tallowtree or other invasive exotic species onto a site by floodwaters may serve to introduce a novel competitor to seedlings included in later restoration efforts there. Complications can arise, as well, during the process of species selection for management at a given site, where on-site light levels, flooding regime, or soil texture may serve to hinder growth of or outright kill some members of a pool of species under consideration for inclusion. 
	Sustainable management and restoration of BLH forests depends in a large part on land managers’ understanding of the preferences and tolerances of tree seedlings. At larger spatial and temporal scales, particularly where changes in forest structure are brought about by extensive management or hydrologic changes, such management necessarily relies to some extent on information and theory derived from field and greenhouse studies in addition to practitioners’ firsthand knowledge. Research addressing tree regeneration in BLH forests has been ongoing for decades and includes a number of projects which have focused on tree species’ responses to gradients in light availability, flooding stress, and a variety of other environmental factors. However, due to the complexity and tree richness of BLH forests, research is generally either broad enough in scope to suggest large-scale patterns or narrow enough to explain observations in detail at small spatial scales or among only a few species, but rarely both. Because of this, continuing research is warranted to further generalize observed community-level patterns in species’ responses to environmental gradients and to explain these patterns in terms of species-specific traits.
	In the context of plant ecology, the “regeneration niche” describes the envelope of environmental conditions which is required by seedlings in order to germinate, establish, and survive to later growth stages. This envelope includes myriad factors which influence survival and growth of seedlings, some of which are widely recognized and well studied, while many others are understudied or specific to particular regions or habitat types. Widely recognized examples of environmental conditions which exhibit important variability at small spatial scales are water availability, sunlight availability, soil texture, pH, and nutrient content and bioavailability. Periodic changes in these variables (e.g. water availability decreasing during summer drought versus spring rains, or seasonal shifts in subcanopy light levels in a deciduous forest) introduce an important temporal aspect to variation, as well. Researchers typically consider a species’ regeneration niche as distinct that of mature individuals because mature individuals typically tolerate a much larger amplitude of conditions, including relatively much harsher or more prolonged stresses, than is tolerable by immature conspecifics. 
	In BLH forests, a tradeoff between tolerance to shade and tolerance to flooding, particularly at early life stages, has been proposed to exert a significant influence on plant community compositional patterns (Kroschel et al. 2016). Strong single-species evidence for this trade-off has been presented by a number of researchers (McCarthy and Evans 2000, Battaglia and Shartiz 2006, Mann et al. 2008). The pattern is less clear at the community scale, however, with various species responding in ways which defy description by clear, general, theories. Multiple hypotheses explaining this trade-off have been proposed, although many do not account adequately for species-level physiology or phenology or propose a mechanism by which it may be imposed on all members of a community to a greater or lesser degree. Disentangling the relative effects of these two stressors on the initial establishment and early growth of BLH tree species will inform a deeper understanding of the maintenance of diversity in these ecosystems and may inform future management and restoration. 







GOALS & OBJECTIVES
	The overall goal of this research is to quantify BLH species’ environmental niches by way of complimentary field and greenhouse experiments in order to inform both silvicultural management of these forests and more general questions regarding species’ niche space and the long-term coexistence of functionally similar species in BLH forests. Specific objectives are as follows:
1.	Quantify the effect of gradients in light availability and flooding pressure on the species composition of BLH understory tree and herbaceous communities under natural conditions across multiple river basins; and  
2.	investigate the physiological basis for a proposed tradeoff between the ability of a given species to adapt to shade and to flooding.












LITERATURE REVIEW
FLOODPLAIN ECOLOGY 
FLOODPLAINS IN A GLOBAL CONTEXT
	Floodplains form in association with rivers in areas where floodwaters periodically rise above the river’s banks and spread across flanking level topography (Lewin 1978, Hupp 2000). Although in many areas they may fall under a legal definition of wetlands, ecologically they represent a transition between permanently-flooded riparian systems and adjacent uplands which experience only ephemeral flooding. The greatest development of floodplains globally occurs in regions where low grade and high water availability coincide, such as the equatorial regions of the South American and African continents, northeastern Africa, and the southeastern North American and Asian coastal plains, although many streams which regularly carry suspended sediment develop topographically level areas which may flood during periods of high water (Adamson et al. 1980, Junk and Furch 1993, Mitsch and Gosselink 2015). These ecosystems are important for provisioning of a number of critical ecosystem services and for the maintenance of biodiversity, but are facing multiple threats and require conservation and restoration. 
	In their natural states, floodplains serve to provision society with a wide array of ecosystem services (Riis et al. 2020). They support fisheries, populations of mammals and birds which may be harvested for meat, pelts, or down, and populations of plant species which may be harvested for timber, fiber, medicine, or food (Petsch et al. 2022). They serve to improve downstream water quality by acting as biochemical sinks for pollutants, including nitrogen- and phosphorus-based agricultural fertilizers, and by removing from the water column and retaining sediment (Hopkins et al. 2018, Gordon et al. 2020). Furthermore, they serve to reduce the intensity of flood pulses and may help to maintain minimum flow in associated rivers during periods of low precipitation (Woltemade et al. 1994, Sholtes and Doyle 2011, Woessner 2000, Acreman and Holden 2013). Ecosystems which occur on floodplains are often among the most biodiverse and productive in their regional context (Kellison and Young 1997, Ward et al. 1999, Tockner and Stanford 2002).  
	The ability of floodplains and associated ecosystems to maintain biodiversity and provide ecosystem services globally has been negatively affected by two related anthropogenic stressors: conversion to agricultural uses and hydrologic alteration. Because they are topographically uniform, fertile, and easily irrigated, floodplains are well suited to support annual agriculture, orchards, and pasture vegetation, and have been converted to these uses at a high rate (Verhoeven and Setter 2010, Schilling et al. 2015). Such conversion directly impacts ecosystem integrity by reducing population sizes of component species and by reducing connectivity among remnant patches. Conversion is also often associated with the construction of levees, which serve to reduce hydraulic connectivity between a given river limited areas of its floodplain, and with the regulation of flow at larger spatial scales by the construction of dams across the main river channel. Changes to a river’s flood regime associated with levee and dam construction indirectly affect communities by changing the conditions under which plant species grow, causing shifts in competitive balance between constituent species, and may serve to reduce “hydraulic diversity” and associated community diversity (Theiling and Burant 2012, Johnson et al. 2016). A recent meta-analysis showed that alterations to flow regime negatively affect species abundances and overall community richness, with strength of response linked to degree of hydrologic modification (Kuiper et al. 2014).  Additionally, retention of sediment in artificial impoundments may lead to an imbalance between sediment deposition and erosion in downstream reaches (Marren et al. 2014). 
	Active management, preservation, and restoration of floodplain communities may help ameliorate impacts thereon of land conversion and hydrologic modification but, in order to be successful, must account for the high spatial and temporal heterogeneity of these systems relative to adjacent uplands (Lopez and Kursar 2007, Langhans et al. 2008, Malenda et al. 2019). Variability in elevation and soil texture interacts with variable timing, duration, and depth of inundation to produce a wide array of conditions experienced by points on the land surface. Inundation characteristics at any given point are themselves borne on by elevation, local- and watershed-level drainage patters, and climate (Hupp 2000, Henriques et al. 2021, Xu et al. 2021). Such variability in abiotic conditions leads to the development of a wide array of vegetative communities, which themselves exhibit internal heterogeneity in disturbance regime and distribution of seral stages. Because such ecosystems are heavily threatened, modified and managed at the global scale, any further understanding of their ecology under natural conditions will inform management and restoration. 
BOTTOMLAND HARDWOOD FORESTS 
	Much of the coastal plain of the southeastern United States, is drained by a dense network of low-gradient streams which, over geologic time, have developed broad, flat alluvial floodplains (Galloway et al. 2011, Kroschel et al. 2016). These floodplains are typically vegetated in “bottomland hardwood” (BLH) forest, a vegetative community of which dominant members are canopy-forming hardwood tree species which all show some degree of tolerance to prolonged soil anoxia. BLH forest tree species richness can be very high relative to other temperate North American forests, with studies consistently reporting over fifteen canopy and understory tree species present at a given site, with a regional maximum of over 50 reported across the Lower Mississippi Alluvial Valley (LMAV) (Kellison and Young 1997, Jones et al. 1994, Hall and Harcombe 2001, Rurup 2022). Although often treated as constituting a uniform guild, tree species found in BLH forests vary widely with regards to characteristics such as tolerance of inundation and soil anoxia, tolerance of shade, foliar phenology, timing of seed shed and subsequent germination, and method of seed dispersal.  
	Such floodplains predictably experience two “hydrologic seasons” in a given year, although the duration, onset, withdrawal, and depth of flooding may vary significantly between years (Figure 2). A dry hydrologic season generally occurs during the late spring, summer, and early fall, during which time high air temperatures and transpiration from growing vegetation serve to draw down water tables and restrict rivers to running within established banks, leaving associated floodplains entirely or mostly exposed. A wet hydrological season occurs during the winter and early spring, during which time water tables may rise due to a combination of low air temperature and dormancy of vegetation such that rivers may inundate parts or all of their associated floodplains (Hupp 2000). Although these alternating seasons generally predict the rise and fall of floodwaters, periods of floodplain exposure or inundation may occur at any point in the year. This regime of semi-regular flooding bears on all aspects of BLH forest ecology and has been termed the “master variable” influencing ecosystem characteristics and represents the single most important distinction between these and adjacent upland ecosystems (Poff et al. 1997, Dixon and Turner 2006). The specifics of flood regime at a given point are borne on heavily by the characteristics of the contributing watershed, where land use types, vegetation cover types, soil textures and depths, slope, and area all affect the rate at which stream depth responds to precipitation (Ogden et al. 2003, Shuster et al. 2005).
	Prior to large-scale logging and land conversion for agriculture in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries, BLH forests were widespread and abundant across the southeastern coastal plain of the modern-day United States. The LMAV supported the single largest area of BLH forest, with an estimated 9.7 million hectares occurring in a broad swathe from the mouth of the river at the Gulf of Mexico to the southern extreme of the state of Illinois, although essentially all rivers in the region supported significant areas of the forest type (Turner et al. 1981, Kroeschel et al. 2016). In East Texas, over a million hectares are estimated to have existed on the floodplains of streams such as the Sabine, Trinity, and Neches Rivers, as well as associated tributaries and smaller streams (Kroeschel et al. 2016). However, these forests represented a valuable timber resource and were underlain by valuable farmland, so have been cleared at a high rate. Average annual loss across the greater southeastern United States is estimated to have been over 174,000 hectares during the fifteen-year period from 1960 to 1975, for a total loss during that period of ca. 2.6 million hectares (Turner et al. 1981, Roelle et al. 1990). In East Texas, losses are estimated to have been ca. 63% over the historical period, with ca. 664 thousand hectares remaining as of a 1987 study (Allen et al. 1997, Kroeschel et al. 2016).
	Because regular flooding acts as a barrier to recruitment and growth of upland species on floodplains, current widespread use of levee and dam systems which reduce the incidence of overland flooding in BLH forests may serve to shift composition towards relatively less flood-tolerant species over coming decades (Gee et al. 2014, Kroeschel et al. 2016, Knox et al. 2022). Additionally, a reduction in flooding may have effects similar to the “mesophication” response of upland forests to fire suppression in that a reduction in disturbance may allow a proliferation of growth in the midstory, in turn suppressing regeneration of species which require high light as seedlings (Abrams 1992, Alldredge and Moore 2012, Johnson et al. 2016). 
HERBACEOUS FLORA OF BOTTOMLANDHARDWOOD FORESTS
	The ecology of herbaceous and suffrutescent species of BLH forests has been studied relatively less intensively than that of economically important tree species. A great deal of what work has been carried out has centered either on generating floristic checklists of species present within the boundaries of BLH forests sites or assessing zonation of vegetation with regards to broad gradients in hydrology (Quine 2000, Brown et al. 2006, Singhurst et al. 2022). A number of studies do directly address the ecology of the BLH herbaceous flora with regards to management and the testing of ecological theory, however. In one important study, four years of repeated post-flood surveys were paired with a greenhouse experiment to investigate community patterns and species-level responses which may follow from the existence of a flood-shade tolerance trade-off (Sloop 2012). This study did not support the existence of a trade-off broadly applicable to all species studied, although individual species did exhibit demographic trends and growth responses consistent with the predictions of such a theory. In another study, life form of herbaceous vegetation in a series of five southern Wisconsin floodplain forests was found to trend from annual at low elevations to perennial at higher elevation (Menges 1986). In a third, the diversity of herbaceous species in an Ohio BLH forest was observed to increase with elevation (Swab et al. 2008). 
	Environmental changes affecting tree regeneration in BLH forests are presumably acting on herbaceous understory communities too, although little research to that end has been carried out. Because herbaceous communities in BLH forests are typically quite a bit richer than co-occurring tree communities, and typically respond more rapidly to changes in environmental conditions, quantification of herbaceous community taxonomic and functional distinctness across multiple environmental gradients may offer a method of more finely subdividing sites than is possible when relying on tree communities, particularly across single-year or otherwise short time scales. As such, surveys of herbaceous species presence and abundance may yield information useful to management for tree-forming species. 
REGENERATION
THE REGENERATION NICHE
	Plant species’ susceptibility to environmental stressors generally decreases with age. Juvenile plants may suffer mortality in response to levels of stress which would minimally affect mature conspecifics and, in general, will not survive except where conditions are within a relatively narrow range conductive to further growth. There is a broad range of factors, both well- and poorly-studied, which vary across space and over time which impact performance of seedlings. Well-studied examples include gradients in water availability, temperature, sunlight, soil pH, and soil and nutrient density and nutrient bioavailability. This envelope of conditions suitable for growth beyond the emergence stage has been termed the “regeneration niche” and is understood to act as an important filter of the presence and spatial distribution of plant species within vegetative communities (Grubb 1977). 
Many species’ spatial distributions and demographic structures follow in a significant way from spatial and temporal patterns of survivorship at the seedling stage (Grubb 1977). Broadly, it has been hypothesized that indefinite co-existence in generally uniform areas of plant species which are functionally similar when mature follows in part from spatial and temporal segregation of survival and growth at early life stages. Adaptations needed for survival at this growth stage may, in fact, be of such overriding importance to some species that they’re retained throughout later growth stages even when maladaptive to a greater or lesser degree (Poorter 2007). A general scheme of niche partitioning by seedlings has been postulated such that seedlings of each species present in an ecosystem are most competitive under a particular limited combination of environmental factors. Such combinations may occur only in certain places and/or at certain times, and thus diversity in regeneration is maintained by variability in environmental conditions. This pattern of niche differentiation follows from the existence of life history tradeoffs, whereby traits which confer an advantage under certain conditions may be either insufficient to ensure survival or represent an unnecessary and maladaptive allocation of resources under other conditions (Wright et al. 2004, Reich 2014). Seedling germination phenology and environmental requirements of economically important BLH species has been the subject of substantial study effort. Germination phenology has been correlated with seed mass, with light-seeded species tending to germinate earlier in a given growing season than heavy-seeded species (Streng et al. 1989, Kroeschel et al. 2016). Seedling light requirements, too, have been linked with seed mass, with greater mass typically allowing for growth under heavier shade, although this effect may not outlast stored energy reserves in the seed endosperm (Crow 1988). 
FLOOD STRESS AND TOLERANCE
	Prolonged inundation of soil induces important chemical changes, particularly with regards to dissolved O2 concentration, pH, and soil redox potential, each of which impact plants in distinct but related ways (Parent et al. 2008, Pedersen et al. 2021). Denial of oxygen to plant roots has the same impact as the denial of oxygen to any aerobically respirating organism – a reduction or cessation of production of ATP at the cellular level and a subsequent decline in cells’ ability to maintain physical integrity, multiply, and perform functions supporting overall organismal needs (Jackson and Colmer 2005). Hypoxia may also induce roots and rhizosphere organisms to transition to anaerobic metabolism, which can lead to increased soil concentrations of toxins such as ethanol, CO2, methane and hydrogen sulfide, in and around roots (Hook 1984, Niinemets and Valladares 2006, Mitsch and Gosselink 2015). Prolonged inundation typically reduces pH, which in turn can lead to loss of nitrogen compounds to the atmosphere and conversion of other compounds from nontoxic or usable to toxic and/or unusable products. These changes can kill or induce dormancy of fine roots, removing the capacity of a plant to uptake water even during periods when leaves are present and leading to what has been termed “physiological drought” (Armstrong and Drew 2002, Niinemets and Valladares 2006, Pezeshki and DeLaune 2012).	
	Vascular plants which tolerate soil anoxia generally do so in one of three ways: conveyance of atmospheric O2 to tissues experiencing hypoxia, rapid growth of new roots into substrate which is not experiencing anoxia, or by undergoing a shift to metabolic pathways which do not require oxygen as a final acceptor of electrons (Parent et al. 2008). Oxygen loss in roots may be mitigated by induced anatomical changes, such as a reduction in surface area relative to volume or an increase in cross-sectional area of root devoted to cortex versus that devoted to the stele (Pedersen et al. 2021).  
FLOOD RESPONSES OF WETLAND HARDWOODS
	A variety of morphological and physiological adaptations to anoxia have been described in hardwood species of BLH forests and similar forested wetlands, particularly those which inhabit low topographic positions. For example, swamp tupelo (Nyssa biflora Walter) has been shown to respond to rhizosphere anoxia with the rapid growth of new, morphologically distinct roots which exhibit higher anaerobic respiration rates and tolerate higher carbon dioxide concentrations than roots grown under aerobic conditions, as well as oxidize their immediate soil environment (Hook, Brown, and Kormanik 1971). Data from the same study suggest, in addition, some degree of oxygen transport from above-ground lenticels to below-ground tissues and adjacent soil which may serve to allow for some degree of root and rhizosphere aerobic respiration or for the detoxification of reductive metabolic byproducts by oxidation. In general, species which exhibit tolerance to soil inundation and root anoxia respond in a manner similar to swamp tupelo, although capacity to do so varies by species (Hook and Brown 1973, Hook 1984). Aerenchyma has not been widely described in bottomland hardwoods. Interestingly, only very scattered reports of aerenchyma in oaks, an important genus of forested wetlands across much of the temperate Northern Hemisphere, exist. Some researchers have claimed that floodplain oaks of the southeastern USA are in fact wholly incapable of aerenchyma formation (Gardiner and Hodges 1996, Schmull and Thomas 2000). Aerenchyma formation has been reported in several European oaks, however. Parenchyma aerenchyma was described in deep (>3 m below the soil surface) fine roots of cork oak (Quercus suber L., subgenus Quercus) (David et al. 2013). Pedunculate oak (Quercus robur L., subgenus Quercus) was also recorded to express genes associated with aerenchyma formation, although the physical structures were not observed (Le Provost et al. 2022). A previous working group studying waterlogging response of pedunculate oak noted the presence of “larger intercellular space in a few samples” of adventitious roots, which were interpreted to represent either rudimentary, unstructured aerenchyma or the result of necrosis unrelated to aerenchyma formation (Parellle et al. 2006).
	Morphological, chemical, and anatomical adaptations to hypoxia may either serve to allow for indefinite survival under hypoxic conditions or, in a larger number of cases, merely to extend the duration of hypoxia which a species can endure before sustaining injury. In a greenhouse study of the responses of four oaks to flooding under fresh and brackish water, photosynthetic rate and transpiration rate of overcup oak seedlings decreased slowly over the course of approximately four months following inundation under fresh water (McLeon and McCarron 1997). Overcup is among the more flood-tolerant hardwoods and the most flood tolerant oak of BLH forests. Mature overcup oak was found to rarely survive four years of continuous soil inundation following hydrologic modification in a Mississippi bottomland (Broadfoot and Williston 1973). Of the seven co-occurring canopy species at this stand, only one other survived this period of flooding, with both species suffering high mortality. In a greenhouse study of flood tolerance of three species within Quercus subgenus Quercus, the white oaks, swamp white oak (Quercus bicolor Willd.) exhibited <1% mortality after 8 weeks of flooding under experimental conditions (Walsh et al. 2008). Although not a species of southeastern BLH forests, swamp white oak is a sister species to overcup oak, occurring generally to the north over its range, and the two species likely exhibit similar responses to flooding pressure (Manos and Hipp 2021). All three species included in this study developed hypertrophied lenticels in response to prolonged inundation, indicating, although not proving, that increased oxygen delivery to roots was an inducible response to chronic flooding. 	 
SHADE STRESS AND TOLERANCE
Shade causes stress to plants both directly and indirectly. Directly, it can cause mortality when it depresses an individual’s rate of carbon fixation below that needed to meet metabolic carbon demand. Indirectly, chronic depression of carbon fixation can reduce an individual’s ability to respond to competition, disease, herbivory, or changing environmental conditions. Adaptation to shade often involves modifications to leaf morphology or photochemistry which ensure a positive ratio of carbon fixation rate to rate of metabolic carbon use under low-light conditions. In general, shade-adapted leaves will have a reduced vertical depth, larger horizontal dimensions, and decreased metabolic requirements than those poorly adapted to shade. They may also be borne for longer portions of the growing season in order to take advantage of changes in light availably caused by deciduous leaf loss of competitors. 
TRADEOFF BETWEEN SHADE AND FLOOD TOLERANCE
Throughout the BLH forest literature many authors have noted a pattern in which seedlings of species which are apparently adapted to tolerate shade are not apparently adapted to tolerate prolonged flooding, and vice-versa. This idea first began to be developed in the scientific literature following long-term research into establishment and mortality trends of BLH trees in the Neches River bottomland of southeastern Texas. In one important study carried out at this site, four years of intensive seedling surveys showed that both light and flooding influenced spatial patterning of seedling growth, establishment and mortality, but that flooding tended to exert a stronger influence than light (Streng 1986, Streng et al. 1989). Later authors carrying out long-term monitoring at a nearby site reported mass mortality of mature individuals of the highly shade-tolerant American hornbeam immediately following an exceptional growing season flood, with minimal mortality of co-occurring species (Mann et al. 2008). This was interpreted by the authors as evidence for a trade-off between the ability of that species to live in shaded conditions and to survive prolonged flooding, although no specific mechanism of shade adaptation or flood-mediated mortality was proposed beyond noting that that the stresses of simultaneous flooding and shade may be additive. In another study, carried out in a karst depression in Tennessee, overcup oak (Quercus lyrata Walter) was found to survive flooding at a lower rate when subjected to shaded conditions versus when growing with relatively greater light availability, which was interpreted as evidence that the species has adapted to the opposite end of a proposed shade-flood adaptive spectrum from American hornbeam (McCarthy and Evans 2000). The authors proposed that this observation was most likely a result of the species simply enjoying a relatively higher growth rate when unshaded than when shaded, allowing seedlings to attain enough height to maintain foliage above water level during flooding. Unfortunately, no mechanism was proposed by which the species could convey oxygen from emergent leaves or stems to submerged tissues. By other accounts, tolerance of flooding by overcup oak seedlings may be conferred by so simple an adaptation as late budbreak, which allows the species to persist in areas from which earlier-flushing species are excluded by to being drowned in early spring floods (Putnam et al. 1960). In a multi-species study carried out in the Congaree Swamp of South Carolina, tree saplings were found to generally segregate along a gradient of depth to water table according to their published shade tolerances, with published shade tolerance increasing with observed average distance to water table (Battaglia and Sharitz 2006). Results of other studies, however, have been inconclusive or contradictory in this regard. A long-term study of sapling dynamics carried out in an East Texas floodplain (incidentally the same area used by Mann et al. 2008) found that flooding affected seedlings of all species generally similarly with regards to mortality, although important departures from this overall trend were evident (Hall and Harcombe 2001). Importantly, this group used a lower height threshold of 0.5 meters, so mortality and recruitment dynamics of seedlings below half a meter in height were not described. Broadly, species appear to respond idiosyncratically to either stressor or to a combination of both, and any trade-off which manifests at the community level is likely to follow from similar but essentially distinct responses at the species level (Battaglia and Sharitz 2006, Sloop 2012). 

METHODS
OBJECTIVE 1: RESPONSE TO LIGHT AVAILABILITY AND FLOODING GRADIENTS OF UNDERSTORY SPECIES COMPOSITION

STUDY REGION
	All study areas are situated within the Pineywoods ecoregion in eastern Texas, a region of pine-hardwood forests in the far eastern portion of the state which represents the southwestern fringe of the broad eastern North American forest (Dyer 2006). The climate of the East Texas Pineywoods has been characterized as “moist subhumid,” “humid subtropical”, and “subtropical” (Clendenen 1994, Diggs et al. 2006, Sayok 1986). The area experiences very hot summers and mild winters during which freezing temperatures occur regularly but rarely for long durations, although frequency, intensity, and duration of freezing does increase with distance from the Gulf Coast (Diggs et al. 2006). Average annual rainfall totals vary across the ecoregion from 152 cm in the east to 98 cm in the west, with a generally equitable distribution throughout the year (Diggs et al. 2006). The region does experience a high degree of interannual variation in precipitation totals, however, such that totals in some years are so low as to cause mortality in plant species which are intolerant of low moisture and so high during some years as to cause prolonged flooding of bottomlands and other low areas. For example, between the years 1901 and 1980, the city of Nacogdoches received less than 89 cm of rain in ten years and more than 165 cm in five years (Sayok 1986). The land surface of the region is mostly composed of sediments transported by rivers and wind from sources to the north and west during the Tertiary and, as such, exhibits flat to rolling surface topography underlain by soft sedimentary rocks (Galloway et al. 2001, Texas Water Science Center 2022). The land descends gently from north to south from a maximum elevation of 193 m (Cusseta Mountain, in Cass County) to sea level at a distance of approximately 400 km to the south at a slope of approximately 50 vertical centimeters per lateral kilometer (0.05% slope), although localized slope can be high where streams have cut into the land surface or recalcitrant sandstones impede erosion.
SURVEY SITES
Surveys will be carried out in floodplains of three East Texas streams – the Neches River, the Angelina River, and the Attoyac Bayou (Figure 1). Each of these floodplains are classified by the USDA Natural Resources Conservation Service as being “frequently flooded”, indicating that “flooding is likely to occur often under normal weather conditions” (Table 2) (Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service). All are forested in a mixture of species typical of floodplain forests in the southeastern United States, such as water oak (Quercus nigra L.), overcup oak, sweetgum (Liquidambar styraciflua L.), black tupelo (Nyssa sylvatica var. sylvatica Marshall), and green ash (Fraxinus pennsylvanica Marshall) (Quine 2000, Rurup 2021). Although care was taken to choose sites which are similar in most aspects, differing principally in specifics of flood regime, some differences in management histories do exist and are addressed in more detail below. Area and spatial extent of contributing watershed upstream of each site as stated in subsequent paragraphs was estimated using ArcMap 10.6.1 and lidar-derived digital elevation models included in the National Elevation Dataset hosted by Texas Natural Resources Information System (TNRIS). 
All surveys carried out on the Neches River floodplain will be confined to the Boggy Slough Conservation Area (BSCA), a tract of land of over 7690 ha spanning parts of eastern Houston and Trinity Counties which has been protected as a conservation easement since 2015 (T.L.L. Temple Foundation 2022). Within the BSCA, all surveys will be conducted in an areas which received chemical treatment for Chinese tallow (Triadica sebifera L.) in both 2015 and 2018 (2.5% solution of Garlon ® XRT by application of 30% solution of Garlon ® XRT) in order to maintain rough similarity in abundance of the species between this and other study areas, which have either received similar treatment (Alazan Bayou WMA) or do not appear to contain a large component of the species at this time (Attoyac Bayou) (Rurup 2021). Overstory composition in the vicinity of the study sites is typical for BLH forests, with ca. 70% of canopy basal area comprised of sweetgum, black tupelo, water oak, willow oak, and overcup oak with minor components of American holly (Ilex opaca Aiton), green ash, and water hickory (Carya aquatica (F. Michx.) Nutt. ex Elliott) as of 2019 (Rurup 2021). Bottomland soils at this site are classified as Ozias silty clays, which experience frequent flooding and exhibit a ‘clayey bottomland’ ecological site (Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service). At its closest approach to BSCA survey quadrats, the Neches River drains a watershed of 6276 km2. Below Lake Palestine, an artificial impoundment of the river 97 linear kilometers to the north of BSCA, the Neches River is devoid of large flood-control structures. Lake Palestine was initially flooded in 1962 and subsequently enlarged in 1971 (Norman and Ott 2017). Sites are all located in the vicinity of Boggy Slough, a small channel flowing within the broader floodplain and the property’s namesake watercourse.  
Surveys carried out on the Angelina River floodplain will be confined to the Alazan Bayou Wildlife Management Area (ABWMA), a tract of land 834 hectares in size located at the southwestern border of Nacogdoches County and administered by Texas Parks and Wildlife (TPWD). At its closest approach to ABWMA study sites, the river drains an area of 4143 km2. No impoundments of the main river channel exist upstream, although several upstream tributaries are impounded (Striker Creek and Bonaldo Creek, as Lake Striker and Lake Nacogdoches, respectively). Common arborescent species recorded in “wet/mesic bottomland forests” and “wet bottomland forests” of ABWMA include water oak, winged elm (Ulmus alata Michx.), post oak (Quercus stellata Wangenh.), swamp post oak (Quercus similis Ashe), loblolly pine (Pinus taeda L.), southern red oak (Quercus falcata Michx.), American hornbeam, sweetgum, willow oak (Quercus phellos L.), Nuttall oak (Quercus texana Buckley), overcup oak, American holly, laurel oak (Quercus laurifolia Michx.) and red maple (Acer rubrum L.) (Quine 2000). Species composition is here reported as pooled among the two forests categories defined by Quine because no such distinction will be made in this study. However, many species were in fact found to be absent or relatively scarce in one or the other category in that study. Bottomland soils at this site are classified as Mantachie clay loam, which experience frequent flooding and exhibit a ‘loamy bottomland’ ecological site (Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service).
Surveys carried out on the Attoyac Bayou floodplain will be confined to publicly-accessible areas of northern Angelina National Forest (ANF). At its closest approach to the study site, the Attoyac Bayou drains an area of 1476 km2. The area of floodplain under study may be inundated by either of two water bodies – by the Attoyac Bayou itself during periods of overbank flow or by Sam Rayburn Reservoir during periods when the reservoir level is near its maximum . Although water surface elevation data do not exist for Sam Rayburn Reservoir before January 10th, 2007, a visual comparison of gage data for Attoyac Bayou and Sam Rayburn reservoir after that date indicate that the Reservoir generally maintains several feet of water on the Attoyac Floodplain after upstream overbank flows have withdrawn (Figure 2). This indicates that a shift towards more hydric conditions in the area under study is likely to have occurred since the filling of Sam Rayburn Reservoir in 1966 (Texas Water Development Board 2022). No formal surveys of forest composition in the stretch of the Attoyac Bayou under study have been carried out, although preliminary visits indicate that the forest is dominated in a generally predictable mixture of hardwoods. Bottomland soils at this site are classified as Mantachie clay loam, which experience frequent flooding and exhibit a ‘loamy bottomland’ ecological site (Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service).
QUADRAT DESIGN AND PLACEMENT
Within each site, naturally occurring canopy gaps resulting from treefall will be located by foot surveys. No attempt will be made to determine the year during which a given gap was formed from evidence visible on-site, such as degree of decomposition of any fallen boles or height of natural regeneration, due to heterogeneity of decomposition and growth rates across time space. At each site, six gaps will be used as focal points for surveys. 
Within each gap, surveys will be carried out in three quadrats, each 0.004046856 hectare (1/100th acre) in size, which will be arrayed along a north-south axis passing through the point of lowest canopy cover and terminating in adjacent forest (Figure 3). This axis is intended to span the full range of possible understory light conditions present in or around any single gap, from a maximum at the point of lowest canopy cover to a minimum in adjacent closed- or nearly closed-canopy forest. The central quadrat will be centered on the point of lowest absolute canopy cover within the gap area. This method is preferred because naturally occurring gaps are frequently irregular in outline and calculation of a geometric center at which to place a quadrat with respect to gap geometry is expected to regularly lead to placement at a point which does not experience a maximum possible light level in gaps with irregular edges. Northern and southern quadrats (collectively referred to as “peripheral quadrats”) will be placed due north or south of the central quadrat, respectively, at a distance of four-thirds the measured distance between the central quadrat center and the canopy-edge drip line in that direction. This method of peripheral quadrat placement is preferred to methods which rely on fixed distance or fixed distance added to a variable quadrat-edge distance because it scales inter-quadrat distance directly with a measure of gap dimensions and indirectly, by extension, with the distance from the gap edge into closed-canopy forest to which gap interior temperature, humidity, and wind may exert an influence. Such edge effects vary in depth from ~5 m (Davies-Colley et al. 2000) to over 200 m (Chen et al. 1995), varying in response to instantaneous magnitude of environmental variables, forest architecture, the relative orientations of wind and edge, season, and myriad other variables. Because the difference between gap and understory environmental conditions varies with gap size (Barik et al. 1992, Latif and Blackburn 2009), this method sacrifices a degree of spatial standardization to increase standardization of unrecorded aspects of the environment by reducing inter-gap differences in the magnitude of edge effects experienced by peripheral quadrats. This method of quadrat placement is expected to depress measured canopy cover at peripheral quadrats relative to that at the gap edge or at a fixed interval beyond the gap edge but is not expected to affect trends in relative canopy coverage between the three quadrats associated with any given gap. This is similar to the method of Diaci et al. (2002), who centered northern and southern survey plots 1 m south or north, respectively, of the edges of gaps included in their study and allowed the distance between the gap-center plot and peripheral plots to vary with gap size, and is modified to account for the heterogeneity in dimensions of naturally occurring gaps. In situations where a separate, visible canopy gap exists due north or south of the gap-center quadrat, the peripheral quadrat will be placed at a bearing 45° east or west of the relevant cardinal direction (i.e. NE, NW, SE, or SW), in the direction where canopy cover is visibly lower from the perspective of the gap center. This quadrat placement methodology represents an attempt to balance competing experimental requirements for spatial randomness and intentional site selection with regards to the spatial distribution of light in an extremely heterogenous forest cover type in the context of a generally time-limited study. 
ENVIRONMENTAL DATA COLLECTION
Within each quadrat, canopy coverage will be measured at each of three heights above ground level at each of five points on the ground using a concave spherical canopy densiometer (Strickler 1959). The three heights will include: 1) ground level (ca. 2 cm above the ground surface), 2) 1.3 m above ground surface, and at the top of regeneration (at 1.3 m above ground level, but any foliage of stems less than 10.6 cm DBH which are rooted in the quadrat and which visually block open sky in the densiometer image will be physically moved or simply discounted from tallying if movement is not possible). The latter of these measurement is intended to be an estimate of the light environment experienced by the upper leaves of regeneration which has attained a height of greater than breast height, to which a breast height open sky fraction measurement cannot be reasonably applied. Measurements will be made at each of five points – quadrat center and the margin of the quadrat in each of the four cardinal directions from quadrat center. At each point and height combination one separate measurement will be taken in each of the four cardinal directions. These four measurements will be averaged prior to use in any analyses, with the southern measurement given relatively more weight than the northern measurement in order to reflect the sun’s southerly track across the sky. Specifics of weighting are not yet determined but will rely on a calibration of canopy densiometer measurements to canopy hemispheric photographs. Taken together, this atypically large number of open sky fraction measurements per quadrat is intended to produce a three-dimensional cylindric model of light environments experienced across that quadrat’s horizontal area of 0.004046856 hectare and to a height equal to the maximum height of regenerating stems rooted therein. The use of canopy hemispherical photography for a more precise estimate of canopy cover was discounted because regeneration canopy above ca. 1.3 meters and true overstory canopy would likely be indistinguishable during image processing. Overstory (DBH > 10.16 cm) basal area will be estimated at each quadrat center in a variable-radius plot (10 BAF prism) The height, DBH, and species identity will be recorded for all overstory trees. 
Landform at quadrat center and at the margin of the quadrat in each of the four cardinal directions from quadrat center will be visually categorized as ridge, bowl, slope, or level. Although absolute topographic relief is generally very low in BLH forests, these four categories correspond with landforms which result from distinct processes and, as such, differ widely in terms of soil texture, drainage, and relative elevation (Hupp 2000). Ridges are typically convex natural levees formed during deposition of coarse sediment at the edge of active river channels. Bowls are typically convex, heavily sedimented, inactive river or slough channels in which thick layers of poorly drained clay soil have formed. Slopes are intermediate between such landforms, and levels are areas in which no identifiable topographic features are present. A sample of soil of ca. 50 cm3 will be collected from the ground surface using a small trowel and bagged for transport. Soil texture will be assessed according to established protocols (Thien 1979). After surveys are complete, field categorizations of quadrat landform will be cross-checked against lidar-derived digital elevation models and soil texture will be compared against known major and minor components of soils reported for the area by the USDA NRCS to ensure accuracy of initial identification (Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service). 
The center elevation of each plot will be defined as relative to its corresponding stream rather than relative to sea level or any specific datum. To achieve this, a multi-step process will be carried out ArcMap independently for each study area. First, a polyline corresponding with each stream will be downloaded from TNRIS. Next, this this polyline will be converted into a series of points, each separated from adjacent points by 10 meters as measured along the polyline. The pixel values from the Digital Elevation Model (DEM) that intersect with these points will be extracted and assigned to the points. Afterwards, a raster will be generated from these assigned elevation values using the IDW (Inverse Distance Weighted Interpolation) tool. This will serve as an elevation model that extends an estimate of interpolated stream elevation across the entire study area. Lastly, the Raster Calculator tool will be used to subtract the pixel values of the interpolated stream elevation raster from the pixel values of the original, unedited DEM. This will result in a new DEM of which pixel values indicate plot elevation relative to interpolated stream elevation. 
A “ponding index” will be estimated for each quadrat included in this study using lidar-derived digital elevation models. This index represents an estimate of the maximum depth of standing water which may be experienced at quadrat center, and will be calculated in ArcMap as the difference in elevation between the cell(s) of a raw DEM with which a quadrat-center point intersects and the same cells in a version of the same DEM in which the elevation of all cells which contribute flow only to small, internally-draining areas has been artificially increased to a minimum value required to simulate contribution of flow to the broader watershed (i.e. all internally-draining basins have been filled). Such an index is expected to correlate only weakly with elevation or visual assessments of landform and will be included in order to allow for finer discrimination between ponding and non-ponding areas than is possible from visual assessment of landform alone. Further estimates of quadrats’ tendency to retain water may be made using other spatial analytic tools as possible and appropriate. 
SEEDLING AND SAPLING DATA COLLECTION
Circular quadrats will be subdivided into four “sections,” each corresponding to one quarter of the circular quadrat, in order to more closely associate seedlings with open sky fraction data than is possible by assigning a single open sky fraction value to the entirely of a quadrat (Figure 4). The basal diameter, height, apparent origin as seed or root sprout, and species identity of all stems with a DBH below 10.16 cm present will be recorded. The open sky fraction experienced at any given height within a given section will be calculated as the weighted mean of values recorded at that height at each of the two open sky fraction measurement points associated with that section. A simplifying assumption will be made that open sky fraction experienced at any given height within any given section does not vary across the area of that section.
HERBACEOUS UNDERSTORY DATA COLLECTION
Records will be made of understory herbaceous and suffrutescent vascular plant species present in each quadrat. Quadrats will not be subdivided into sections for collection or analysis of herbaceous species data, as in the case of seedling and sapling surveys. Percent ground cover of each species present as seen from an overhead vantage point will be recorded, such that percentages will not total to greater than 100% (Swab et al. 2008). Open sky fraction data used in subsequent analyses will be only that recorded at 1.3 m above ground level, with overall quadrat open sky fraction calculated as a weighted average of all five open sky fraction measurements at that height in that quadrat. 
AUTONOMOUS FLOOD DATA RECORDING
Three game cameras (Browning 18MP Strike Force APEX Trail Camera) and simple depth gages (horizontal lines made with commercial tree-marking paint at one-foot intervals up a tree stem, from one to seven feet above ground level) will be installed at each study area. Cameras will take hourly photographs of depth gages during daylight hours for the duration of their installation, and photographs will subsequently be uploaded to a computer for visual quantification of water depth above ground level. Water surface elevation at a given depth gage will be calculated as the depth of water above ground level plus the elevation of ground level at that point as indicated by a relevant digital elevation model. Water surface elevation across the study area at large will be calculated as the average of three camera-specific values and will be assumed to not fluctuate across the area of a site at any given point in time. The relationship between water surface elevations as recorded by on-site depth gages and that recorded by the nearest USGS stream gage will be estimated by regressing on-site depth gage water elevations on simultaneous USGS gage elevations. Such a regression will allow estimation of hourly water surface elevation at a site across the entirety of the period of record of the relevant USGS gage. Estimates may be used to formally describe flood regime or to identify discrete periods of exceptionally long or deep flooding using tools in the R package EGRET and similar tools designed to describe stream flow regimes (Hirsch and De Cicco 2015). USGS gages to be used will be: 1) Attoyac Bayou near Chireno, TX (gage number: 08038000; coordinates 31.50434957, -94.3043677), 2) Sam Rayburn Reservoir near Jasper, TX (gage number: 08039300; coordinates: 31.06075076, -94.106025), 3) Neches River near Diboll, TX (gage number: 08033000; coordinates: 31.13296574, -94.8099306), and 4) Angelina River near Alto, TX (gage number: 08036500; coordiantes: 31.67184364, -94.9527152). 
SEEDLINGS AND SAPLING SURVEYS ANALYSIS
For all data analysis, juvenile trees will be classified as one of three categories: saplings, large seedlings, or small seedlings. Saplings are here defined here as juvenile trees >1.3 m tall and with DBH of less than 10.16 cm, large seedlings as juvenile trees ≤1.3 m and >0.15 m tall, and small seedlings as juvenile trees ≤0.15 m tall (Holladay et al. 2006). A threshold of 1.3 m height between saplings and seedlings was chosen in order to perfectly associate these size classes with the height at which breast height open sky fraction measurements will be taken.
Because gap age is uncontrolled in this study, simple measures of stem DBH, stem height, or species areal density in response to light level are insufficient for analyses because they fail to distinguish between the contributions of stem age and site-specific growth rates to observed diameter and height values. To account for this, use of DBH, height, and density metrics will be limited to size class-specific analyses (e.g., number of stems per hectare for stems <0.15 m tall may be used in analyses, but no analyses will be carried out in which all seedling and sapling stems, regardless of size class, are combined without regard for size class). For whole-community analyses, species’ presence within a given section will be expressed as fractional volume relative to all stems within that section, such that species’ fractional volumes in a section sum either to one or to a value predicted by regressing total section stem volume on environmental variables across all study sites. This will serve both to reduce the effect of inter-gap age differences on juvenile trees’ DBH and height distributions and density and minimize contributions to overall community metrics of species which reproduce prolifically but suffer high juvenile mortality, such as American hornbeam and water elm (Planera aquatica J.F.Gmel.). Stem volumes will be estimated using relevant allometric equations or, if appropriate allometric equations do not exist for the stem dimensions and species under consideration, as the volume of a cone, three-dimensional normal distribution, or a similar three-dimensional model with equivalent height and basal dimensions. 
Habitat optima of species, higher taxa, and functional groups with regards to environmental variables will be estimated in two distinct ways. First, independent multiple linear and quadratic regressions of species biomass per unit area on all or a subset of predictor variables will be carried out (Austin 1985, Wang et al. 2006, Lian et al. 2022). Species habitat optima with regards to any single environmental variable will be treated as equal to the value of the predictor variable(s) at which modeled biomass reaches a maximum. Quadratic models will be utilized because species biomass is expected to follow a of unimodal, rather than monotonic, distribution with regard to environmental variables. Multiple exploratory models will be generated, and final model selection will be based on comparisons of R2 and other diagnostic statistics. Separate models will be generated using a variety of schemes for the categorization of tree species. In addition to simple species identity, individual trees will be categorized by higher taxonomy (genus, family, or subgenus where relevant), seed weight class, seed germination class (i.e., species with seeds which exhibit epi- or hypogeal germination), published level of flood tolerance, published level of shade tolerance, and status as native or non-native (Table 1). Environmental data used will be that collected at or assigned to individual sections or to full quadrats as appropriate (flood metrics, open sky fraction, soil texture, etc.). Pearson correlation coefficients will be generated and reported for all environmental variables which are included in the final models. 
Secondly, modeling tools available in the R package ade4 will be used to estimate species’ multidimensional niche breadths and, importantly, the degree of overlap or separation thereof between species (Dolédec et al. 2000, Dray and Dufour 2007). 
	Significance of community differentiation will be tested by applying PERMANOVA and pairwise PERMANOVA to matrices of inter-quadrat Bray-Curtis dissimilarity, with the overall observed community subdivided into groupings such as river basin, landform, open sky fraction, or any other environmental variables which are identified as exerting influence on species habitat optima. 
HERBACEOUS SURVEYS ANALYSIS
Analysis of herbaceous communities will be very similar to the analysis of seedling and sapling communities described above, with several key differences. First, there will be no subdivision of observations by size class. While the vertical nature of tree data suggests a need for stratification of data collection and analysis, analysis of generally two-dimensional herbaceous communities does not require such stratification. Secondly, a species’ percent cover, rather than volume, will be treated as its response to environmental conditions. Third, data will be not be subdivided by section, as with seedling and sapling community data. Analysis will refer to the full 0.004046856 ha plot as the smallest unit of measurement. Lastly, only canopy coverage data recorded from 1.3 m above ground level will be used in analyses. 
OBJECTIVE 2: PHYSIOLOGICAL BASIS OF A HYPOTHESIZED TRADE-OFF BETWEEN SHADE ADAPTATION AND FLOOD ADAPTATION
SPECIES SELECTON AND STUDY DESIGN
	A study of species’ responses to shade, prolonged soil inundation, and a combination of the two stressors will be carried out under experimental conditions in a greenhouse. The principal purpose of this study will be to investigate whether or not adaption to either shade or prolonged soil inundation actively precludes adaptation to the other under controlled experimental condition and with regards to a limited number of physiological and growth metrics. Ideally, this study will show that measured traits which are associated with tolerance to flooding are independent from those associated with tolerance to shade under a tightly circumscribed set of experimental conditions. This study does not seek to refute decades of observation regarding these species’ clear sorting along these two gradients in a real-world context but rather to refine hypotheses about the drivers thereof. A secondary objective is to provide data on species-specific responses to multiple stressors which may partially explain observations of their and related species’ ecologies.
	Seedlings of American hornbeam and overcup oak will be used in this study. These species represent, respectively, a species which is tolerant of shade but intolerant of flooding and vice versa, as constrained within the range of flooding intensity experienced by southeastern river floodplains (Hook 1984, Gardiner 2001). These species were selected because they have been the subject of growth and mortality studies along gradients of light and flood stress (McCarthy and Evans 2000, Mann et al. 2008). Species selection more generally was restricted to members of the Fagales in order to minimize possible confounding effects of ordinal-level differences in the range of possible responses. 
	American hornbeam is a common, widespread species of BLH forests, in which it occurs most abundantly on well-drained, moderately elevated ridges composed of sand and silt (Nixon et al. 1977, Burns 1990). It is a shade-tolerant species typical of midstory layers in these forests, although it does respond favorably to release and can be a problematic competitor of more desirable trees after thinning. The species is consistently ranked as highly tolerant of shade, with seedlings generally more tolerant than more mature individuals (Burns 1990). Observed shade tolerance in the species may partially follow from phenology of foliar activity and photosynthetic carbon uptake, which typically begins earlier in the spring and extends later into the autumn than many overstory trees with which it co-occurs (Augspurger et al. 2005). However, it does display leaf physiological traits which broadly follow a shade tolerance syndrome, such as a low respiration rate per unit nitrogen concentration, high fractional nitrogen allocation to chlorophyll, and low leaf mass per area relative to co-occurring understory hardwoods when grown under minimal shade (Henry and Aarsen 2001). American hornbeam has long been recognized as being highly susceptible to flooding relative to other hardwoods present in BLH forests (Burns 1990). In a study of seedling mortality under complete submersion, the species was reported to suffer 50% mortality after 31.5 days (Marks and Atia 2020). This value was intermediate between those of wetland and upland species included in the study and was interpreted by the authors to represent a “threshold” separating flood tolerances of the two species groups. 
	Overcup oak is a common, widespread canopy tree of southeastern bottomland forests and is frequently an overstory dominant in areas where inundation by overbank flow and subsequent ponding during the growing season is regular (Putnam et al. 1960, Burns 1990). A variety of flood-tolerance schema have been applied to the species by different authors, but all agree that it is extremely tolerant of prolonged growing-season flooding relative to other bottomland oaks and is at the upper end of flood tolerance relative to bottomland hardwood species generally (Hook 1984, Clatterbuck 2005). The species has been recorded to survive for two years under conditions of continuous flooding, although the depth of the flooding and age of the individuals included in that study were not reported (Burns 1990). Seedlings and mature trees do exhibit different responses to prolonged inundation, however, with mature individuals being generally more capable of surviving for long periods than seedlings. In a 2020-21 study of seedling and sapling survivorship in a BLH forest of eastern Texas, seedlings of the species were reported to have survived at a minimum rate of 43.1% between the two years (Rurup 2021). Notably, 2021 inundation of that floodplain began during the winter and persisted until late in the growing season and, as such, many of these surviving seedlings were partially or entirely submerged for several months during the growing season immediately prior to surveys. Survivorship can be variable however, with seedlings reportedly suffering high mortality due to inundation of unreported depth and duration in other studies (Burns 1990). The species is not apparently adapted to long-term persistence under low-light conditions. In such circumstances, seedlings will typically attain minimal height growth and will typically suffer high mortality within three years if not released (Putnam 1960). Long-term persistence and growth beyond the seedling stage generally occur only where light is abundant, such as in a naturally-occurring treefall gap or in stands subject to silvicultural thinning. Response of overcup oak to low soil redox potential has been described in significant detail, albeit under a limited range of experimental conditions (Pezeshki et al. 1996). Over a 22-day period during which seedlings were subject to a low soil O2 concentration, the species exhibited reduced rates of foliar transpiration, net carbon assimilation, root elongation, and biomass accumulation versus a control. During the same period, however, no significant difference between treatment and control individuals was observed for ethylene production, rate of root alcohol dehydrogenase (ADH) activity, or leaf chlorophyll concentration. Interestingly, responses exhibited by overcup oak were similar to those exhibited by the relatively less flood-tolerant cherrybark oak (Quercus pagoda Raf.), indicating that differences in habitat preference may be related to differences in aspects of these species’ physiologies not then under consideration. Another mechanism by which overcup oak seedlings may tolerate flooding is by simply staying dormant until later in the spring than most co-occurring species, weathering early spring floods in a non-active state (Burns 1990). Although overcup oak does respond negatively to flooding at all life stages, and at the seedling life stage in particular, the species does represent an extreme within both the order Fagales and members of the southeastern BLH flora with regards to a tolerance for the stress of growing-season flooding. 
	Seedlings will be subject to a full-factorial experiment in which treatments will be shade intensity and soil flooding intensity (Figure 5). The shade intensity treatment will have two levels: no shade and partial shade (seedlings under shade cloth). The flood intensity treatment will have two levels: normally watered and permanently flooded (flooded for the duration of the experiment with standing water to ca. 5 mm above the soil surface). All seedlings except those subject to permanent flooding will be watered to field capacity every other day. The experiment also will include two supplementary treatments applied to small extra pools of seedlings: chronic underwatering, simulating drought, and reduced foliar CO2 availability. These supplemental treatments are not included as independent experimental manipulations per se, but rather to potentially provide insight into the mechanisms of stress or mortality of seedlings which are experiencing flood or shade stress, respectively. One group of seedlings will be subjected to chronic underwatering. Similar trends in growth or gas-exchange measurements of either species between underwatering and flooding treatments may point to root dormancy and resulting cessation of water uptake as the mechanism of stress to flooded seedlings. Root dormancy and associated "physiological drought" is a well-studied response to flooding and soil hypoxia (Tang and Kozlowski 1982, Armstrong and Drew 2002, Pezeshki and DeLaune 2012). Seedlings subject to true drought will at no point be subject to shade. The second supplementary treatment will involve measuring leaf gas exchange under conditions of reduced carbon dioxide availability in air immediately adjacent to the leaf surface (referred to as "CO2 scrub," in reference to the use of the capacity of a LI-6800 to supply air with a reduced CO2 concentration to the leaf surface). Reduced CO2 availability can lead to a reduced rate of photosynthetic carbon fixation without an associated reduction in dark respiration rate. Similar gas exchange responses between seedlings subjected to the CO2 scrub and shade treatments may point to reduction in carbon uptake as a mechanism of stress to shaded seedlings. 
	Seeds will be cold stratified at ca. 4 Celsius between mid-February and mid-June of 2023. Following stratification, seeds will be allowed to germinate in small pots in a temperature- and photoperiod-controlled grow chamber and allowed to grow there for two and a half months. Herbaceous weeds will be manually removed but no herbicide will be used, and any fungal or arthropod infestations will be treated with a minimum of pesticide if necessary. In mid-July, all seedlings will be moved from the grow chamber to an outdoor greenhouse. They will be allowed to acclimate with watering twice daily for two weeks prior to any experimental manipulations. 675 overcup oak acorns and 765 American hornbeam seeds will be purchased, translating to 472 and 535 seedlings of each species, respectively, at an assumed germination rate of 70%. This experiment, as outlined above, requires a maximum of 435 individuals of each species. 
	In early August 2023, prior to any experimental treatment, the height and basal diameter of all seedlings will be recorded as a baseline. All seedlings will be scored in terms of vigor on a 1-10 scale and individual trays photographed from a fixed distance, bearing, and array of exposure settings for later reference. Qualitative notes regarding vigor assessment will be made. Experimental manipulations will begin immediately after initial measurements have begun, with all measurements made on days 1, 2, 4, 8, and then weekly thereafter for a total of 10 measurement days over a duration of 50 calendar days. Ideally, both immediate physiological and longer-term anatomical or morphological induced responses will be detected within this time span. Ninety seedlings of each species will be subject to each main treatment, of which a subset of 10 will be retained unharmed and used for repeated gas exchange measurements for the duration of the experiment while the rest will be used for destructive measurements of leaf water potential, biomass and biomass allocation, and induced hypoxia responses. Gas exchange measurements of the 10 undamaged seedlings will be made on each experiment day during dark hours (beginning ca. 12 AM) and during early daylight hours (beginning ca. 2 hours after sunrise). Tentatively, 2 gas exchange measurements will be made for each species in each time of day in each treatment in each experiment day. Assuming that any single gas exchange measurement will require ten minutes, this translates to two 220-minute periods of measurement per experiment day. This estimate of time required for any single gas exchange measurements approximates the time requirement published in Ajala et al. (2022), but this value may necessarily be modified following pre-experiment tests of species’ responses to measurement. Measurements will be made prior to the beginning of experimental treatments, on day #1, #2, #4, and #8, then weekly thereafter. Species and treatments will be arranged in four blocks perpendicular to the direction of prevailing direction of air flow (Figure 4). 
WATER POTENTIALS 
During each time period (night and day) on each experiment day, four leaf water potential measurements will be made of each species in each treatment, including the true drought treatment., and water potential of two leaves of one individual per treatment by block combination will be recorded. 
LEAF GAS EXCHANGE
	A variety of leaf gas exchange variables will be recorded. 
1.	Dark respiration rate (Pn; µ mol m−2 s−1), stomatal conductance (Gs; mol m−2 s−1), intracellular [CO2] (Ci; µ mol mol−1), and transpiration rate (Tr; m mol m−2 s−1). Measurements will be made using a LI-6800 Portable Photosynthesis System. Measurements will be made at night.  
2.	Net photosynthetic rate (Pn; µ mol m−2 s−1), stomatal conductance (Gs; mol m−2 s−1), intracellular [CO2] (Ci; µ mol mol−1), and transpiration rate (Tr; m mol m−2 s−1). Measurements will be made using a LI-6800 Portable Photosynthesis System. Measurements will be made at night.   
3.	Net photosynthetic rate (Pn; µ mol m−2 s−1), stomatal conductance (Gs; mol m−2 s−1), intracellular [CO2] (Ci; µ mol mol−1), and transpiration rate (Tr; m mol m−2 s−1). Measurements will be made using a LI-6800 Portable Photosynthesis System. Measurements will be made during the day. Chamber [CO2] will be reduced to 200 ppm. 
4.	Leaf water potential of two seedlings of each species from each treatment, including the underwatered group. 
5.	After measurement for water potential, the seedling, excised leaves, and associated soil will be frozen for later measurements of biomass and investigations into induced or constitutive flood responses, including adventitious roots, aerenchyma, or visibly oxidized root channel. 
DATA ANALYSIS
	Data gathered in the course of this experiment will be analyzed in several distinct ways. First, and most simply, linear models of species’ observed growth, mortality, and gas exchange at any given point in time will be modeled using linear regression, with blocks treated as random effects and species identity, treatment levels, and possible interactions between treatments treated as predictors. Secondly, visual comparisons will be made of recorded values between days or binned periods of days in order to assess change across time, and any apparent single-species trends will be investigated statistically using tools such as repeated measures ANOVA. Both species are expected to respond negatively to both stressors, but relative magnitudes are expected to differ significantly. 
	Independence of species’ responses to levels of each treatment will be assessed both statistically and in a more qualitative manner. In the former case, the significance of a flood X shade interaction term in any linear models used will be tested. In the latter, the tendency of induced responses relevant to one stressor to require or suppress those relevant to the other will be assessed, although specific predictions cannot be made at this time because little is known about the specifics of these species’ manner of adaptation to flood or shade stress. 	




 
Table 1. Taxonomy, seed germination type and weight, published shade and flood tolerance classes, and status and native or non-native of common canopy and woody mid-story species of East Texas BLH forests. 
Species	Subgenus	Family	Order	Germination	Weight of 1000 Seeds (g)	Shade Tolerance	Flood Tolerance	Native/Non-Native
Acer rubrum	N/A	Sapindaceae	Sapindales	Epigeal1	23.687	Tolerant1	Very Tolerant1	Native
Carya aquatica	N/A	Juglandaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	2771.87	Intermediate1	Very Tolerant1	Native
Carya ovata	N/A	Juglandaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	4401.27	Intermediate1	Intolerant1	Native
Carpinus caroliniana	N/A	Betulaceae	Fagales	Epigeal1	25.977	Very Tolerant1	Intolerant8	Native
Celtis laevigata	N/A	Cannabaceae	Rosales	Epigeal1	76.057	Tolerant1	Intermediate8	Native
Diospyros virginiana	N/A	Ebenaceae	Ericales	Epigeal1	364.577	Very Tolerant1	Intermediate8	Native
Fraxinus pennsylvanica	N/A	Oleaceae	Lamiales	Epigeal1	32.327	Tolerant1	Tolerant8	Native
Ilex decidua	N/A	Aquifoliaceae	Aquifoliales	Epigeal1	11.547	Tolerant8	Tolerant8	Native
Ilex opaca	N/A	Aquifoliaceae	Aquifoliales	Epigeal1	17.207	Very Tolerant8	Intolerant8	Native
Liquidambar styraciflua	N/A	Altingiaceae	Saxifragales	Epigeal1	5.017	Intolerant1	Intermediate8	Native
Nyssa sylvatica 	N/A	Cornaceae	Cornales	Epigeal1	151.257	Intermediate8	Intolerant8	Native
Pinus taeda	N/A	Pinaceae	Pinales	Epigeal1	26.197	Intolerant1	Intermediate1	Native
Planera aquatica	N/A	Ulmaceae	Rosales	Epigeal1	?	Tolerant9	Very Tolerant8	Native
Quercus laurifolia	Lobate	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	810.997	Tolerant1	Tolerant8	Native
Quercus lyrata	Quercus	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	3243.477	Intolerant1	Tolerant8	Native
Quercus michauxii	Quercus	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	 5339.967	Intolerant1	Intolerant8	Native
Quercus nigra	Lobate	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	1138.917	Intolerant1	Intolerant8	Native
Quercus pagoda	Lobate	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	783.037	Intolerant1	Very Intolerant8	Native
Quercus phellos	Lobate	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	893.367	Intolerant1	Tolerant8	Native
Quercus texana	Lobate	Fagaceae	Fagales	Hypogeal1	47857	Intolerant1	Intermediate8	Native
Triadica sebifera	N/A	Euphorbiaceae	Malpighiales	Epigeal7	146.437	Tolerant10	Tolerant10	Non-Native
Ulmus americana	N/A	Ulmaceae	Rosales	Epigeal1	5.047	Intermediate1	Intermediate8	Native

References: 1. Burns and Honkala 1990; 2. Gates 1951; 3. Hawker 1932; 4. Fisher 2008; 5. Australian Botanic Garden; 6. Wallnöfer 2001; 7. Wilder and Relish 2022; Society for Ecological Restoration; 8. SFA Silviculture; 9. USFS Climate Change Atlas; 10. USDA Fire Effects Information System
 


 
Figure 1.  Location of study sites within Texas. Site names are here shown as the river associated with the river bottom under study, with property names noted in parentheses. 


 


 

Figure 2: Daily average river depths of the Neches River, Angelina River, and Attoyac Bayou over the period Jan 1, 2017 to Dec 31, 2021 (blue lines). Data are normalized to published National Weather Service minimum flood stage such that a depth greater than zero denotes some degree of flooding per that definition. Because the region of the Attoyac Bayou under study may be inundated both by the Bayou or Sam Rayburn Reservoir, water surface elevation of the Reservoir, normalized to the average elevation of study sites, is superimposed on flood stage data and shown (brown line). These data are preliminary and will be calibrated to on-site conditions by the use of long-term hourly photography by on-site game cameras.
 


 
Figure 3. Spatial arrangement of quadrats within a plot. Plots are centered on existing treefall gaps and, by extension, ground-level light environment will vary between quadrats from full- or nearly -full sunlight to full shade. 







  
Figure 4. Spatial arrangement of a single quadrat. (a) Top-down view of a quadrat, showing four quarter-circle sections radiating outwards from a shared center. Each blue circle represents a point at which open sky fraction will be measured. The red line denotes the circular quadrat’s radius but does not correspond with any single measurement point. (b) Side view of the vertical arrangement of open sky fraction measurement heights above ground level. Four measurements will be taken at each of three heights above ground level. Note that (a) contains five separate open sky fraction points.  
 
Figure 5.  Physical arrangement of greenhouse study. The left four columns depict the main treatments, arranged across four repeating blocks. Numbers in parentheses denote the number of seedlings present in each cell. 
 

REFERENCES
Abrams, M.D., 1992. Fire and the development of oak forests. BioScience, 42(5), pp.346-353.
Acreman, M. and Holden, J., 2013. How wetlands affect floods. Wetlands, 33(5), pp.773-786.
Adams, S.B., Hamel, P.B., Connor, K., Burke, B., Gardiner, E.S. and Wise, D., 2007. Potential roles of fish, birds, and water in swamp privet (Forestiera acuminata) seed dispersal. Southeastern Naturalist, 6(4), pp.669-682.
Alldredge, B. and Moore, G., 2014. Assessment of riparian vegetation sensitivity to river hydrology downstream of a major Texas dam. River research and applications, 30(2), pp.230-244.
Allen, J.A., 1997. Reforestation of bottomland hardwoods and the issue of woody species diversity. Restoration ecology, 5(2), pp.125-134.
Armstrong, A., Drew, M.C., 2002. Root growth and metabolism under oxygen deficiency, in: Waisel, Y., Eshel, A., Beeckman, Kafkafi, U. (Ed.), Plant Roots. CRC Press, Boca Raton. 
Augspurger, C.K., Cheeseman, J.M. and Salk, C.F., 2005. Light gains and physiological capacity of understorey woody plants during phenological avoidance of canopy shade. Functional Ecology, pp.537-546.
Austin, M.P., 1985. Continuum concept, ordination methods, and niche theory. Annual review of ecology and systematics, 16(1), pp.39-61.
Barnes, W.J., 1978. The distribution of floodplain herbs as influenced by annual flood elevation. Wisconsin Academy of Sciences, Arts and Letters, 66, pp.254-266.
Battaglia, L.L. and Sharitz, R.R., 2006. Responses of floodplain forest species to spatially condensed gradients: a test of the flood–shade tolerance tradeoff hypothesis. Oecologia, 147(1), pp.108-118.
Boulanger, V., Baltzinger, C., Saïd, S., Ballon, P., Picard, J.F. and Dupouey, J.L., 2009. Ranking temperate woody species along a gradient of browsing by deer. Forest Ecology and Management 258(7), 1397-1406.
Broadfoot, W.M. and Williston, H.L., 1973. Flooding effects on southern forests. Journal of Forestry, 71(9), pp.584-587.
Clatterbuck, W.K., 2005. Shade and flood tolerance of trees. University of Tennessee, Agricultural Extension Service.
Clendenen, L.D., 1994. The hydroclimatic characteristics of Nacogdoches, Texas, with implications for water resources management (Master’s thesis). Stephen F. Austin State University, Nacogdoches, TX.
Crow, T.R., 1988. Reproductive mode and mechanisms for self-replacement of northern red oak (Quercus rubra)-a review. Forest science, 34(1), pp.19-40.
Cunningham, K.K., Peairs, S.E., Ezell, A.W., Belli, K.L. and Hodges, J.D., 2011. Understory light conditions associated with partial overstory removal and midstory/understory control applications in a bottomland hardwood forest. Forests, 2(4), pp.984-992.
David, T.S., Pinto, C.A., Nadezhdina, N., Kurz-Besson, C., Henriques, M.O., Quilhó, T., Cermak, J., Chaves, M.M., Pereira, J.S. and David, J.S., 2013. Root functioning, tree water use and hydraulic redistribution in Quercus suber trees: A modeling approach based on root sap flow. Forest Ecology and Management, 307, pp.136-146.
Diggs, G.M., Lipscomb, B.L., Reed, M.D., O’Kennon, R.J., 2006. Illustrated Flora of East Texas Vol. 1. Botanical Research Institute of Texas, Fort Worth, TX. 
Dixon, M.D., Turner, M.G., 2006. Simulated recruitment of riparian trees and shrubs under natural and regulated flow regimes on the Wisconsin River, USA. River Research and Applications 22(10), 1057-1083. 
Dray, S. and Dufour, A.B., 2007. The ade4 package: implementing the duality diagram for ecologists. Journal of statistical software, 22, pp.1-20.
Dyer, J.M., Revisiting the deciduous forests of eastern North America. BioScience 56(4) 341-352. 
Galloway, W.E., Whiteaker, T.L., Ganey-Curry, P., 2011. History of Cenozoic North American drainage basin evolution, sediment yield, and accumulation in the Gulf of Mexico basin. Geosphere 7(4), 938-973. 
Gardiner, E.S. and Hodges, J.D., 1996. Physiological, morphological and growth responses to rhizosphere hypoxia by seedlings of North American bottomland oaks. In Annales des sciences forestières (Vol. 53, No. 2-3, pp. 303-316). EDP Sciences.
Gardiner, E.S., 2001. Ecology of bottomland oaks in the southeastern United States. In In: Proceedings of the third International Oak Conference Asheville, North Carolina, December.
Gates, R.R., 1951. Epigeal germination in the Leguminosae. Botanical Gazette, 113(2), pp.151-157.
Gee, H.K., King, S.L. and Keim, R.F., 2014. Tree growth and recruitment in a leveed floodplain forest in the Mississippi River Alluvial Valley, USA. Forest Ecology and Management, 334, pp.85-95.
Gordon, B.A., Dorothy, O. and Lenhart, C.F., 2020. Nutrient retention in ecologically functional floodplains: A review. Water, 12(10), p.2762.
Grubb, P.J., 1977. The maintenance of species richness in plant communities: the importance of the regeneration niche. Biological Reviews 52, 107-145. 
Henriques, M., McVicar, T.R., Holland, K.L. and Daly, E., 2022. Riparian vegetation and geomorphological interactions in anabranching rivers: A global review. Ecohydrology, 15(2), p.e2370.
Henry, H.A. and Aarssen, L.W., 2001. Inter‐and intraspecific relationships between shade tolerance and shade avoidance in temperate trees. Oikos, 93(3), pp.477-487.
Hirsch, R.M., and De Cicco, L.A., 2015, User guide to Exploration and Graphics for RivEr Trends (EGRET) and dataRetrieval: R packages for hydrologic data (version 2.0, February 2015): U.S. Geological Survey
Holladay, C.A., Kwit, C. and Collins, B., 2006. Woody regeneration in and around aging southern bottomland hardwood forest gaps: effects of herbivory and gap size. Forest Ecology and Management 223(1-3), 218-225.
Hook, D.D., Brown, C.L., Kormanik, P.P., 1971. Inductive Flood Tolerance in Swamp Tupelo (Nyssa sylvatica var. biflora (Walt.) Sarg.). Journal of Experimental Botany 22(1), 78-89.
Hook, D.D. and Brown, C.L., 1973. Root adaptations and relative flood tolerance of five hardwood species. Forest Science, 19(3), pp.225-229.
Hook, D.D., 1984. Waterlogging Tolerance of Lowland Tree Species of the South. Southern Journal of Applied Forestry 8(3) 136-149.
Hopkins, K.G., Noe, G.B., Franco, F., Pindilli, E.J., Gordon, S., Metes, M.J., Claggett, P.R., Gellis, A.C., Hupp, C.R. and Hogan, D.M., 2018. A method to quantify and value floodplain sediment and nutrient retention ecosystem services. Journal of Environmental Management, 220, pp.65-76.
Hupp, C.R., 2000. Hydrology, geomorphology and vegetation of Coastal Plain rivers in the south-eastern USA. Hydrological Processes 14(16-17), 2991-3010. 
Jackson, M.B., Colmer, T.D., 2005. Response and Adaptation by Plants to Flooding Stress. Annals of Botany 96(4) 501-505. 
Johnson, S.E., Amatangelo, K.L., Townsend, P.A. and Waller, D.M., 2016. Large, connected floodplain forests prone to flooding best sustain plant diversity. Ecology, 97(11), pp.3019-3030.
Jones, R.H., Sharitz, R.R., Dixon, P.M., Segal, D.S. and Schneider, R.L., 1994. Woody plant regeneration in four floodplain forests. Ecological monographs, 64(3), pp.345-367.
Junk, W.J. and Furch, K., 1993. A general review of tropical South American floodplains. Wetlands ecology and management, 2(4), pp.231-238.
Kellner, K.F. and Swihart, R.K., 2017. Herbivory on planted oak seedlings across a habitat edge created by timber harvest. Plant Ecology, 218(2), 213-223.
King, S.L. and Keim, R.F., 2019. Hydrologic modifications challenge bottomland hardwood forest management. Journal of Forestry, 117(5), pp.504-514.
Kobe, R.K., Pacala, S.W., Silander Jr, J.A. and Canham, C.D., 1995. Juvenile tree survivorship as a component of shade tolerance. Ecological applications, 5(2), pp.517-532.
Kroschel, W.A., King, S.L., Keim, R.F., 2016. Tree Regeneration by Seed in Bottomland Hardwood Forests: A Review. Southeastern Naturalist 15(9), 42-60. 
Kuiper, J.J., Janse, J.H., Teurlincx, S., Verhoeven, J.T. and Alkemade, R., 2014. The impact of river regulation on the biodiversity intactness of floodplain wetlands. Wetlands Ecology and Management, 22(6), pp.647-658.
Langhans, S.D., Tiegs, S.D., Gessner, M.O., Tockner, K., 2008. Leaf-decomposition heterogeneity across a riverine floodplain mosaic. Aquatic Sciences 70, 337-346. 
Le Provost, G., Brachi, B., Lesur, I., Lalanne, C., Labadie, K., Aury, J.M., Da Silva, C., Postolache, D., Leroy, T. and Plomion, C., 2022. Gene expression and genetic divergence in oak species highlight adaptive genes to soil water constraints. Plant Physiology, 190(4), pp.2466-2483.
Lewin, J., 1978. Floodplain geomorphology. Progress in Physical Geography, 2(3), pp.408-437.
Lian, Z., Wang, J., Zhang, C., Zhao, X. and von Gadow, K., 2022. Mismatch between species distribution and climatic niche optima in relation to functional traits. Forest Ecosystems, 9, p.100077.
Loach, K., 1967. SHADE TOLERANCE IN TREE SEEDLINGS: I. LEAF PHOTOSYNTHESIS AND RESPIRATION IN PLANTS RAISED UNDER ARTIEICIAL SHADE. New Phytologist, 66(4), pp.607-621.
Lopez, O.R., Kursar, T.A., 2007. Interannual variation in rainfall, drought stress and seedling mortality may mediate monodominance in tropical flooded forests. Ecophysiology 154, 35-43. 
Malenda, H.F., Sutfin, N.A., Guryan, G, Stauffer, S., Rowland, J.C., Williams, K.H., Singha, K., 2019. From Grain to Floodplain: Evaluating heterogeneity of floodplain hydrostatigraphy using sedimentology, geophysics, and remote sensing. Earth Surface Processes and Landforms 44, 1799-1815. 
Mann, L.E., Harcombe, P.A., Elsik, I.S. and Hall, R.B., 2008. The trade‐off between flood‐and shade‐tolerance: A mortality episode in Carpinus caroliniana in a floodplain forest, Texas. Journal of Vegetation Science 19(6), 739-746.
Manos, P.S. and Hipp, A.L., 2021. An updated infrageneric classification of the North American oaks (Quercus subgenus Quercus): Review of the contribution of phylogenomic data to biogeography and species diversity. Forests, 12(6), p.786.
Marks, C.O. and Atia, H., 2020. Seedling submergence tolerances accurately predict riparian tree species distributions: insights to help design environmental flows. Wetlands, 40(6), pp.1923-1934.
Marren, P.M., Grove, J.R., Webb, J.A. and Stewardson, M.J., 2014. The potential for dams to impact lowland meandering river floodplain geomorphology. The Scientific World Journal, 2014.
McCarthy, S.E. and Evans, J.P., 2000. Population dynamics of overcup oak (Quercus lyrata) in a seasonally flooded karst depression. Journal of the Torrey Botanical Society, pp.9-18.
McLeod, K.W., McCarron, J.K. and Conner, W.H., 1999. Photosynthesis and water relations of four oak species: impact of flooding and salinity. Trees, 13(4), pp.178-187.
Menges, E.S., 1986. Environmental correlates of herb species composition in five southern Wisconsin floodplain forests. American Midland Naturalist, pp.106-117.
Mitsch, W.J. and Gosselink, J.G., 2015. Wetlands. John Wiley & Sons.
Munsell, A.H. and Nickerson, D., 1915. Munsell color system. Wadsworth, Howland & Company, Incorporated.
Niinemets, Ü. and Valladares, F., 2006. Tolerance to shade, drought, and waterlogging of temperate northern hemisphere trees and shrubs. Ecological monographs, 76(4), pp.521-547.
Nixon, E.S., Willett, R.L. and Cox, P.W., 1977. Woody vegetation of a virgin forest in an eastern Texas river bottom. Castanea, pp.227-236.
Norman, J., Ott, R., 2018. Lake Palestine 2017 Fisheries Management Survey Report. 
Ogden, F.L., Dawdy, D.R., 2003. Peak Discharge Scaling in Small Hortonian Watershed. Journal of Hydrologic Engineering 8(2) 64-73. 
Oksanen, J., Blanchet, F.G., Kindt, R., Legendre, P., Minchin, P.R., O’Hara, R.B., Simpson, G.L., Solymos, P., Stevens, M.H.H. and Wagner, H., 2013. Community ecology package. R package version, 2(0).
Parent, C., Crevècoeur, M., Capelli, N. and Dat, J.F., 2011. Contrasting growth and adaptive responses of two oak species to flooding stress: role of non‐symbiotic haemoglobin. Plant, cell & environment, 34(7), pp.1113-1126.
Parelle, J., Brendel, O., Bodénès, C., Berveiller, D., Dizengremel, P., Jolivet, Y. and Dreyer, E., 2006. Differences in morphological and physiological responses to water-logging between two sympatric oak species (Quercus petraea [Matt.] Liebl., Quercus robur L.). Annals of Forest Science, 63(8), pp.849-859.
Parent, C., Capelli, N., Berger, A., Crèvecoeur, M. and Dat, J.F., 2008. An overview of plant responses to soil waterlogging. Plant stress, 2(1), pp.20-27.
Pedersen, O., Sauter, M., Colmer, T.D. and Nakazono, M., 2021. Regulation of root adaptive anatomical and morphological traits during low soil oxygen. New Phytologist, 229(1), pp.42-49.
Petsch, D.K., Cionek, V.D.M., Thomaz, S.M. and dos Santos, N.C.L., 2022. Ecosystem services provided by river-floodplain ecosystems. Hydrobiologia, pp.1-22.
Pezeshki, S.R., Pardue, J.H. and DeLaune, R.D., 1996. Leaf gas exchange and growth of flood-tolerant and flood-sensitive tree species under low soil redox conditions. Tree Physiology, 16(4), pp.453-458.
Pezeshki, S.R., DeLaune, R.D., 2012. Soil oxidation-reduction in wetlands and its impact on plant functioning. Biology 1(2) 196-221. 
Pile, L.S., Wang, G.G., Stovall, J.P., Siemann, E., Wheeler, G.S. and Gabler, C.A., 2017. Mechanisms of Chinese tallow (Triadica sebifera) invasion and their management implications–a review. Forest Ecology and Management, 404, pp.1-13.
Poff, L.N.R., Allan, J.D., Bain, M.B., Karr, J.R., Prestegaard, K.L., Richter, B.D., Sparks, R.E., Stromberg, J.C., 1997. The Natural Flow Regime 47(11), 769-784. 
Poorter, L., 2007. Are species adapted to their regeneration niche, adult niche, or both? The American Naturalist 169(4), 433-442.   
Putnam, J.A., Furnival, G.M. and McKnight, J.S., 1960. Management and inventory of southern hardwoods (No. 181). US Department of Agriculture, Forest Service.
Quine, J.D., 2000. A vegetation analysis of the Alazan Wildlife Management Area (Master’s thesis). Stephen F. Austin State University, Nacogdoches, TX. 
R Core Team, 2016. R: A Language and Environment for Statistical Computing, Vienna, Austria. https://www.R-project.org/.
Reich, P.B., 2014. The world-wide ‘fast-slow’ plant economics spectrum: a traits manifesto. Journal of Ecology 102, 275-301. 
Roelle, J.E., Auble, G.T., and Gosselink, J.G., 1990. ‘Introduction,’ in Gosselink, J.G., Lee, L.C., and Muir, T.A. Ecological Processes and Cumulative Impacts: Illustrated by Bottomland Hardwood Wetland Ecosystems. Chelsea, Michigan. pp. 1.
Raymond, P., Bédard, S., Roy, V., Larouche, C. and Tremblay, S., 2009. The irregular shelterwood system: review, classification, and potential application to forests affected by partial disturbances. Journal of Forestry, 107(8), pp.405-413.
Riis, T., Kelly-Quinn, M., Aguiar, F.C., Manolaki, P., Bruno, D., Bejarano, M.D., Clerici, N., Fernandes, M.R., Franco, J.C., Pettit, N. and Portela, A.P., 2020. Global overview of ecosystem services provided by riparian vegetation. BioScience, 70(6), pp.501-514.
Rurup, L.J.V., Kidd, K.R., Stovall, J.P., Oswald, B.P. and Jack, S.B. Occurrence and growth dynamics of natural regeneration in an East Texas bottomland hardwood forest. 
Sayok, A.K., 1986. Some Statistical Analyses of the Climate of Nacogdoches, Texas for Applications in Natural Resources Management (Master’s thesis). Stephen F. Austin State University, Nacogdoches, TX. 
Schilling, K.E., Jacobson, P.J. and Vogelgesang, J.A., 2015. Agricultural conversion of floodplain ecosystems: Implications for groundwater quality. Journal of environmental management, 153, pp.74-83.
Seago Jr, J.L., Marsh, L.C., Stevens, K.J., SOUKUP, A., Votrubova, O. and Enstone, D.E., 2005. A re-examination of the root cortex in wetland flowering plants with respect to aerenchyma. Annals of Botany, 96(4), pp.565-579.
Sholtes, J.S. and Doyle, M.W., 2011. Effect of channel restoration on flood wave attenuation. Journal of Hydraulic Engineering, 137(2), pp.196-208.
Shuster, W.D., Bonta, J., Thurston, H., Warnemuende, E. and Smith, D.R., 2005. Impacts of impervious surface on watershed hydrology: A review. Urban Water Journal, 2(4), 263-275.
Sloop, J., 2012. Examining the shade/flood tolerance tradeoff hypothesis in bottomland herbs through field study and experimentation. University of North Texas.
Streng, D.R., Glitzenstein, J.S. and Harcombe, P.A., 1989. Woody seedling dynamics in an east Texas floodplain forest. Ecological Monographs, 59(2), pp.177-204.
Strickler, G., 1959. Use of the densiometer to estimate density of forest canopy on permanent sample plots. PNW Old Series Research Notes, 180, pp. 1-5
Survey Staff, Natural Resources Conservation Service, United States Department of Agriculture. Web Soil Survey. http://websoilsurvey.sc.egov.usda.gov/ (accessed April 5th, 2022).
Swab, R.M., Zhang, L. and Mitsch, W.J., 2008. Effect of hydrologic restoration and Lonicera maackii removal on herbaceous understory vegetation in a bottomland hardwood forest. Restoration Ecology, 16(3), pp.453-463.
T.L.L Temple Foundation. History/Legacy. https://www.boggysloughconservation.org/history-legacy (accessed April 3rd, 2022). 
Texas Water Development Board. Sam Rayburn Reservoir (Neches River Basin). https://www.twdb.texas.gov/surfacewater/rivers/reservoirs/sam_rayburn/index.asp (accessed April 3rd, 2022). 
Turner, R.E., Forsythe, S.W. and Craig, N.J., 1981. Bottomland hardwood forest land resources of the southeastern United States. Wetlands of bottomland hardwood forests, 11, pp.13-28.
Texas Water Science Center (USGS TWSC). Geologic Database of Texas, 2014-02-01. Web. 2022-04-27.
Theiling, C.H. and Burant, J.T., 2013. Flood inundation mapping for integrated floodplain management: Upper Mississippi River system. River Research and Applications, 29(8), pp.961-978.
Thien, S.J., 1979. A flow diagram for teaching texture‐by‐feel analysis. Journal of Agronomic education 8(1), 54-55.
United States Geological Survey (USGS). Neches River Basin Lidar, 2017-02-22. Web. 2022-04-27.
Valladares, F. and Niinemets, Ü., 2008. Shade tolerance, a key plant feature of complex nature and consequences. Annual Review of Ecology, Evolution, and Systematics, pp.237-257.
Verhoeven, J.T. and Setter, T.L., 2010. Agricultural use of wetlands: opportunities and limitations. Annals of botany, 105(1), pp.155-163.
Walsh, M.P., Van Sambeek, J.W. and Coggeshall, M.V., 2008. Variation in flood tolerance of container-grown seedlings of swamp white oak, bur oak, and white oak. In In: Jacobs, Douglass F.; Michler, Charles H., eds. 2008. Proceedings, 16th Central Hardwood Forest Conference; 2008 April 8-9; West Lafayette, IN. Gen. Tech. Rep. NRS-P-24. Newtown Square, PA: US Department of Agriculture, Forest Service, Northern Research Station: 446-456. (Vol. 24).
Wang, T., Hamann, A., Yanchuk, A., O'neill, G.A. and Aitken, S.N., 2006. Use of response functions in selecting lodgepole pine populations for future climates. Global Change Biology, 12(12), pp.2404-2416.
Ward, J.V., Tockner, K. and Schiemer, F., 1999. Biodiversity of floodplain river ecosystems: ecotones and connectivity. River Research and Applications, 15(1‐3), pp.125-139.
Woessner, W.W., 2000. Stream and fluvial plain ground water interactions: rescaling hydrogeologic thought. Groundwater, 38(3), pp.423-429.
Woltemade, C.J. and Potter, K.W., 1994. A watershed modeling analysis of fluvial geomorphologic influences on flood peak attenuation. Water Resources Research, 30(6), pp.1933-1942.
Wright, I.J., Reich, P.B., Westoby, M., Ackerly, D.D., Baruch, Z., Bongers, F., Cavender-Bares, J., Chapin, T., Cornelissen, J.H., Diemer, M. and Flexas, J., 2004. The worldwide leaf economics spectrum. Nature, 428(6985), 821-827.
Xu, H., Torres, R., van der Steeg, S. and Viparelli, E., 2021. Geomorphology of the Congaree River floodplain: Implications for the inundation continuum. Water Resources Research, 57(12), p.e2020WR029456.
